Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 13. REGULATION OF PROFESSIONALS

SUBTITLE B. AGENTS

CHAPTER 4056. NONRESIDENT AGENTS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 4056.001. APPLICABILITY OF TITLE. This title applies to licensing of a nonresident agent under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 4056.002. RIGHTS OF LICENSE HOLDERS. Except as otherwise specifically provided by this code, an individual who is not a resident of this state and to whom a license is issued under this chapter has the same rights and privileges as a resident license holder.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 4056.003. RECIPROCAL LICENSING AGREEMENTS. The commissioner may enter into an agreement with the appropriate official of another state as necessary to implement reciprocal licensing of nonresident agents.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 4056.005. RULES. The commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to implement this subchapter and Subchapter B and to meet the minimum requirements of federal law, including regulations.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

SUBCHAPTER B. NONRESIDENT AGENT LICENSE

Sec. 4056.051. APPLICATION FOR NONRESIDENT AGENT LICENSE; CRIMINAL HISTORY. (a) To apply for a license to act as a nonresident agent, a person who is not a resident of this state must submit to the department:

(1) an application on a form prescribed by the department; and

(2) the nonrefundable license application fee.

(b) An applicant who does not hold an insurance agent's license in the applicant's state of residence must, through the law enforcement agency of the state of residence, submit to the department a copy of the applicant's criminal history records. The department shall use the criminal history records to determine the applicant's eligibility for issuance of a license in accordance with this title and other laws of this state.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 4056.052. ISSUANCE OF LICENSE TO NONRESIDENT AGENT LICENSED IN OTHER STATE. (a) The department shall issue a license to an applicant under this chapter if:

(1) the applicant holds a license in good standing as an agent in the applicant's state of residence; and

(2) the applicant's state of residence will grant a nonresident agent license on a reciprocal basis to a resident agent of this state.

(b) The department may issue a reciprocal nonresident agent license to an applicant if the authority granted by the license issued by the applicant's state of residence is generally comparable to the authority granted by a license issued by this state.

(c) A license issued under this section shall be automatically suspended, canceled, or revoked if the licensee's home state suspends, cancels, or revokes the licensee's corresponding resident license.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 355 (H.B. 4030), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 4056.053. ISSUANCE OF LICENSE TO NONRESIDENT AGENT NOT LICENSED IN OTHER STATE. The department shall issue a license to an applicant under this chapter if the applicant has:

(1) passed the examination for an agent's license required under this title;

(2) met the eligibility requirements for issuance of a license after an examination of the applicant's criminal history records under Section 4056.051(b); and

(3) satisfied the requirements for a license for an individual under this code, including Subchapter C, Chapter 4001.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 4056.054. ISSUANCE OF LICENSE TO CORPORATION OR PARTNERSHIP. The department shall issue a license to an applicant under this chapter if the applicant has satisfied the requirements for a license for a corporation or partnership under Subchapter C, Chapter 4001.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 4056.055. WAIVER OF REQUIREMENTS FOR NONRESIDENT AGENT LICENSED IN OTHER STATE OR JURISDICTION. The department may waive any license requirement for an applicant who holds a valid license from another state or jurisdiction if:

(1) that state or jurisdiction has license requirements substantially equivalent to those of this state; or

(2) the waiver is necessary to promote reciprocal licensing of nonresident agents among a majority of the states.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 4056.056. RESTRICTIONS ON LINE OF INSURANCE BUSINESS FOR RECIPROCAL NONRESIDENT AGENT LICENSE. A nonresident agent licensed under Section 4056.052 may not act as a nonresident agent for a line of insurance business in this state unless the agent is authorized in the agent's state of residence to act in that state as an agent for that line of insurance business.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 4056.057. CONTINUING EDUCATION. (a) The continuing education requirements imposed under Chapter 4004 do not apply to a person who:

(1) holds a license issued under this chapter; and

(2) is in compliance with the continuing education requirements of the person's state of residence.

(b) A person who holds a license issued under this chapter and who does not hold an insurance agent's license in the person's state of residence shall comply with the continuing education requirements imposed under Chapter 4004.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 4056.058. SERVICE OF PROCESS. The commissioner is the agent for service of process in the manner provided by Subchapter C, Chapter 804, in a legal proceeding against a nonresident agent who holds a license issued under this chapter if:

(1) the nonresident agent does not appoint or maintain an agent for service in this state;

(2) an agent for service is appointed but cannot with reasonable diligence be found; or

(3) the license of the nonresident agent is revoked.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 4056.059. TRANSITION TO RESIDENT AGENT LICENSE. (a) This section applies only to an individual who is a nonresident agent licensed under Section 4056.052 and who has moved from the other state that licensed the individual to this state.

(b) A nonresident agent may apply to the department for a comparable license for residents of this state. An application must include:

(1) a notification of the agent's change of address and contact information; and

(2) fingerprint forms in the format prescribed by the department, which may be electronic.

(c) If a nonresident agent submits a satisfactory application in accordance with Subsection (b), the department shall issue a comparable resident agent license to the agent and cancel the agent's nonresident agent license.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1172 (S.B. 876), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 355 (H.B. 4030), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2021.